Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4608.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 800. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise: (a) "Ability to pay" means the ability of a responsible party to pay for the cost of services, as determined by the department under sections 818 and 819. (b) "Cost of services" means the total operating and capital costs incurred by the department or a community mental health services program with respect to, or on behalf of, an individual. Cost of services does not include the cost of research programs or expenses of state or county government unrelated to the provision of providing mental health services. (c) "Individual" means the individual, minor or adult, who receives services from the department or a community mental health services program or from a provider under contract with the department or a community mental health services program. (d) "Inpatient services" means 24-hour care and treatment services provided by a state facility or a licensed hospital. (e) "Insurance benefits" means payments made in accordance with insurance coverage for the cost of health care services provided to an individual. (f) "Insurance coverage" means any a policy, plan, program, or fund established or maintained for the purpose of providing for its participants or their the participants' dependents medical, surgical, or hospital benefits. Insurance coverage includes, but is not limited to, medicaid or medicare; Medicaid or Medicare; policies, plans, programs, or funds maintained by nonprofit hospital service and medical care corporations, health maintenance organizations, and prudent purchaser organizations; and commercial, union, association, self-funded, and administrative service policies, plans, programs, and funds. (g) "Nonresidential services" means care or treatment services that are not inpatient or residential services. (h) "Parents" means the legal father and mother parents of an unmarried individual who is less than 18 years of age. (i) "Residential services" means 24-hour dependent care and treatment services provided by adult foster care facilities under contract to the department or a community mental health services program or provided directly by a community mental health services program. (j) "Responsible party" means a person who is financially liable for services furnished to the individual. Responsible party includes the individual and, as applicable, the individual's spouse and parent or parents of a minor. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.